Utah statutes.
77-38-12.   Construction of this chapter -- No right to set aside conviction, adjudication, admission, or plea -- Severability clause.

(1)  All of the provisions contained in this chapter shall be construed to assist the victims of crime.

(2)  This chapter may not be construed as creating a basis for dismissing any criminal charge or delinquency petition, vacating any adjudication or conviction, admission or  plea of guilty or no contest, or for a defendant to obtain appellate, habeas corpus, or other relief from a judgment in any criminal or delinquency case.

(3)  This chapter may not be construed as creating any right of a victim to appointed counsel at state expense.

(4)  All of the rights contained in this chapter shall be construed to conform to the Constitution of the United States.

(5) (a)  In the event that any portion of this chapter is found to violate the Constitution of the United States, the remaining provisions of this chapter shall continue to operate in full force and effect.

(b)  In the event that a particular application of any portion of this chapter is found to violate the Constitution of the United States, all other applications shall continue to operate in full force and effect.

(6)  The enumeration of certain rights for crime victims in this chapter shall not be construed to deny or disparage other rights granted by the Utah Constitution or the Legislature or retained by victims of crimes.



Amended by Chapter 120, 2009 General Session

